Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) No person in this state may purchase or possess a firearm unless that person is:(i) Insured under a firearm liability policy or covered by a firearm liability bond meeting the requirements of subsection (2) of this section;(ii) Self-insured as provided in subsection (3) of this section; or(iii) Covered by a certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of subsection (4) of this section. (b) Compliance with this requirement constitutes financial responsibility for the purpose of this section. Proof of financial responsibility to purchase or possess a firearm must be provided on the request of a dealer or law enforcement officer in the format specified under subsection (5) of this section.(2) Firearm Liability Policy and Bond Requirements.(a) A firearm liability policy or bond under this section must: (i) Be issued by an insurance company or surety company authorized to do business in this state; (ii) provide at least $25,000 of coverage per incident arising from accidental or unintentional discharge of the covered firearm causing injury, death, or property damage; and (iii) identify the specific firearm covered by the policy or bond.(b) Firearm liability policies and bonds must be obtained on a per-firearm basis, with a separate policy or bond required for each distinct firearm.(3) Self-Insurance Requirements.(a) Any person possessing more than 25 firearms may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the department of licensing as provided in (b) of this subsection.(b) The department of licensing may, in its discretion, upon the application of such a person, issue a certificate of self-insurance when it is satisfied that such person is possessed and will continue to be possessed of the ability to pay a judgment obtained against such person arising from accidental or unintentional discharge of their firearms causing injury, death, or property damage.(c) Upon not less than five days' notice and a hearing pursuant to such notice, the department of licensing may upon reasonable grounds cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Failure to pay any judgment within 30 days after such judgment shall have become final shall constitute a reasonable ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance.(4) Certificate of Deposit Requirements.(a) Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by a certificate issued by the department of licensing establishing that the person named therein has deposited with the department $25,000 in cash, or securities such as may legally be purchased by savings banks or for trust funds of a market value of $25,000.(b) Certificates of deposit must be obtained on a per-firearm basis, with a separate certificate required for each distinct firearm.(5) Proof of Financial Responsibility.(a) Whenever an insurance or surety company issues or renews a firearm liability insurance policy or bond, the company shall provide the policyholder or bondholder with an identification card as specified by the department of licensing. At the policyholder's or bondholder's request, the insurance or surety company shall provide the policyholder or bondholder a card for each firearm covered under the policy or bond. The card required by this subsection may be provided in either paper or electronic format. Acceptable electronic formats include the display of electronic images on a cellular phone or any other type of portable electronic device.(b) The department of licensing shall adopt rules specifying the type, style, and content of identification cards to be used for proof of compliance with this section, including the method for issuance of such identification cards by persons or organizations providing proof of compliance through self-insurance, certificate of deposit, or bond.(c) Whenever a law enforcement officer asks any person purchasing or possessing a firearm to display proof of financial responsibility, failure to display such proof creates a presumption that the person has not complied with the financial responsibility requirement of this section.(d) Failure to provide proof of financial responsibility to purchase or possess a firearm at the request of a dealer while purchasing a firearm, or at the request of a law enforcement officer while possessing a firearm, is a class 1 civil infraction.(e) For the purposes of this section, when a person uses a portable electronic device to display proof of financial responsibility to a law enforcement officer, the officer may only view the proof of financial responsibility and is otherwise prohibited from viewing any other content on the portable electronic device.(f) Whenever a person presents a portable electronic device pursuant to this section, that person assumes all liability for any damage to the portable electronic device.(g) If a person given notice of a civil infraction for a violation of this section appears in person before the court and provides written evidence that at the time the person was given notice, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of this section, the notice of civil infraction shall be dismissed and the court may assess court administrative costs of $25 at the time of dismissal. In lieu of personal appearance, a person given notice of a civil infraction for a violation of this section may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance before the court, submit by mail to the court written evidence that, at the time the person was given notice, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of this section, in which case the notice of civil infraction shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court may assess court administrative costs of $25 at the time of dismissal.(h) Any person who knowingly provides false evidence of financial responsibility to a dealer, law enforcement officer, or court, including an expired or canceled insurance policy, bond, or certificate of deposit, is guilty of a misdemeanor.(6) This section does not apply to:(a) Antique firearms;(b) Federal peace officers, general authority Washington peace officers, and limited authority Washington peace officers, as those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020;(c) An active member of the United States armed forces while on duty.(7) The department of licensing may adopt rules for carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this section.Sec. 2. RCW 9.41.090 and 2023 c 161 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, no dealer may deliver a firearm to the purchaser thereof until:(a) The purchaser provides proof of completion of a recognized firearm safety training program within the last five years that complies with the requirements in RCW 9.41.1132, or proof that the purchaser is exempt from the training requirement;(b) The purchaser provides proof the purchaser has complied with or is exempt from the financial responsibility requirements established in section 1 of this act;(c) The dealer is notified by the Washington state patrol firearms background check program that the purchaser is eligible to possess a firearm under state and federal law; and(((c)))(d) The requirements and time periods in RCW 9.41.092 have been satisfied.(2) In determining whether the purchaser is eligible to possess a firearm, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall check with the national instant criminal background check system, provided for by the Brady handgun violence prevention act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq.), the Washington state patrol electronic database, the health care authority electronic database, the administrative office of the courts, LInX-NW, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.(3)(a) At the time of applying for the purchase of a firearm, the purchaser shall sign and deliver to the dealer an application containing:(i) His or her full name, residential address, date and place of birth, race, and gender;(ii) The date and hour of the application;(iii) The applicant's driver's license number or state identification card number;(iv) A description of the firearm including the make, model, caliber and manufacturer's number if available at the time of applying for the purchase of the firearm. If the manufacturer's number is not available at the time of applying for the purchase of a firearm, the application may be processed, but delivery of the firearm to the purchaser may not occur unless the manufacturer's number is recorded on the application by the dealer and transmitted to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program; and(v) A statement that the purchaser is eligible to purchase and possess a firearm under state and federal law.(b) The dealer shall provide the applicant with information that contains two warnings substantially stated as follows:(i) CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. State permission to purchase a firearm is not a defense to a federal prosecution; and(ii) CAUTION: The presence of a firearm in the home has been associated with an increased risk of death to self and others, including an increased risk of suicide, death during domestic violence incidents, and unintentional deaths to children and others.The purchaser shall be given a copy of the department of fish and wildlife pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms and firearms safety.(c) The dealer shall, by the end of the business day, transmit the information from the application through secure automated firearms e-check (SAFE) to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program. The original application shall be retained by the dealer for six years.(d) The dealer shall deliver the firearm to the purchaser once the requirements and period of time specified in this chapter are satisfied. The application shall not be denied unless the purchaser is not eligible to purchase or possess the firearm under state or federal law or has not complied with the requirements of this section.(e) The Washington state patrol firearms background check program shall retain or destroy applications to purchase a firearm in accordance with the requirements of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922.(4) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding identity or eligibility requirements on the application to purchase a firearm is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.(5) This section does not apply to sales to licensed dealers for resale or to the sale of antique firearms.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person in this state may deposit with the department of licensing at least $25,000 in cash, or securities such as may legally be purchased by savings banks or for trust funds of market value of at least $25,000, for the purpose of complying with section 1 of this act.(b) The department of licensing shall not accept a deposit or issue a certificate of deposit unless the deposit is accompanied by a declaration, signed under penalty of perjury, stating the depositor's full legal name; mailing address; primary phone number; the make, model, and serial number of the firearm to be covered by the requested certificate; and that there are no unsatisfied judgments of any character against the depositor in the county where the depositor resides.(2) Any depositor or their representative may return a valid certificate of deposit to the department of licensing in exchange for the return of all corresponding cash or securities that were deposited with the department of licensing to obtain the certificate, but only upon providing the department of licensing with a declaration, signed under penalty of perjury, stating:(a) The depositor: (i) No longer possesses the firearm covered by the certificate and does not intend to regain possession of that firearm in the future; or (ii) has obtained a valid insurance policy, liability bond, certificate of self-insurance, or another certificate of deposit covering the firearm at issue in accordance with section 1 of this act; and(b) There are no unsatisfied judgments of any character against the depositor arising from accidental or unintentional discharge of the depositor's covered firearm causing injury, death, or property damage.(3)(a) Any claimant who has obtained a final and enforceable legal judgment against a depositor that arises from accidental or unintentional discharge of the depositor's covered firearm causing injury, death, or property damage, and which was issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, may file a request with the department of licensing for payment of the depositor's cash or securities deposited with the department of licensing in satisfaction of the legal judgment against the depositor. Any request filed under this subsection must be accompanied by proof the judgment meets the requirements of this subsection.(b) If the department of licensing is satisfied the conditions of this subsection have been met, it must provide notice to the depositor of the claim and, no sooner than 30 days after providing notice to the depositor, pay the requested deposit to the claimant unless the court that entered the judgment against the depositor orders the department of licensing to withhold payment of the deposit to the claimant.(c) After a depositor receives notice a claim has been made against a deposit and before the department of licensing pays the deposit to the claimant, if the depositor believes the claimant is not entitled to payment of the deposit, the depositor may seek an order from the court that entered the judgment against the depositor directing the department of licensing to withhold payment to the claimant.(4) A certificate of deposit issued under this section is no longer valid if the depositor or their representative requests and obtains the return of the deposit, the value of the deposit falls below $25,000, or the deposit is paid to a claimant in accordance with this section.(5)(a) Whenever a person deposits qualifying cash or securities with the department of licensing under this section and provides the department with all required information, the department shall issue a certificate of deposit to that person within 30 days stating the depositor's full legal name, the value of the deposited cash or securities, the date of deposit, the date the certificate was issued, the specific firearm the certificate covers, and contact information to reach the department to verify the authenticity and present validity of the certificate.(b)(i) Whenever a person who has previously been issued a certificate of deposit by the department of licensing requests an updated certificate, and the value of the deposit continues to match or exceed $25,000, the department shall issue an updated certificate to that person within 30 days.(ii) The department of licensing shall issue up to one updated certificate of deposit to a requester per calendar year free of charge to the requester, but the department may charge the requester for the costs of time, materials, and mailing required to provide an updated certificate for all subsequent updated certificates issued within the same calendar year.(6)(a) The firearm financial responsibility account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from deposits made pursuant to this section must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to (i) return a deposit to a depositor or their representative pursuant to this section; (ii) make a payment to a claimant pursuant to this section; or (iii) make a payment of interest or other income accrued on a deposit to the department of commerce pursuant to this subsection. Only the director of the department of licensing or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.(b) Any interest or other income accrued on a deposit held under this chapter shall be paid quarterly, by the director of the department of licensing or the director's designee, to the department of commerce for the purpose of funding the office of firearm safety and violence prevention.(7)(a) The department of licensing shall maintain records of all deposits made under this section, including the depositor's legal name and address, the value and date of each deposit, and whether each deposit is in the department's custody, has been returned in whole or in part to a depositor or their representative, or has been paid in whole or in part to a claimant. The department of licensing shall retain these records while the corresponding deposit remains wholly or partially in place and for at least six years thereafter.(b) The department of licensing shall maintain records of all certificates of deposit issued under this section, including the legal name and address of each person a certificate has been issued to, the date each certificate was issued, the status and value of any corresponding deposit for which the certificate was issued, the present validity of each certificate issued, and the specific firearm each certificate covers. The department shall retain these records while the corresponding certificate remains valid and for at least six years thereafter.(8) The department of licensing may adopt rules for carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this section.Sec. 4. RCW 43.84.092 and 2024 c 210 s 4 and 2024 c 168 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the firearm financial responsibility account, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 5. RCW 43.84.092 and 2024 c 210 s 5 and 2024 c 168 s 13 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the firearm financial responsibility account, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:(1) A firearm range operator shall carry a general liability insurance policy providing at least $1,000,000 of coverage per incident. Compliance with this requirement constitutes financial responsibility for the purpose of this section.(2) For the purpose of this section, "firearm range" means a privately owned structure or outdoor area, operated for profit, that allows members of the public to discharge firearms within the structure or outdoor area for testing, training, or recreational purposes, excluding hunting wildlife.(3) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. Except for section 5 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2028.--- END ---